Rhode Island, session 2025, SB773.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-2-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-2 entitled "School
Committees and Superintendents [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education
Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-2-2. City and town schools required — School year — Location — Kindergartens.
(a)(1) Except as specifically provided in this section, every city or town shall establish and
maintain for at least one hundred eighty (180) days annually or the equivalent thereof, exclusive of
holidays, a sufficient number of schools in convenient places under the control and management of
the school committee and under the supervision of the Rhode Island Board of Education. In lieu of
a convenient location, the school committee may provide transportation for pupils to and from
school in accordance with the provisions of chapter 21 of this title. Provided, that a school district
may establish a school year that is the equivalent of one hundred eighty (180) days through the use
of longer school days or combination of longer and shorter school days in terms of school hours,
or pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, and that may total less than one hundred eighty (180)
separate days, so long as through the use of longer school days or through the use of a combination
of longer and shorter school days, the school district annually provides a minimum of one thousand
eighty (1,080) school hours in a single school year. For purposes of clarification, the intent herein
is to permit school districts flexibility in the delivery of educational services, but to ensure that in
doing so, school districts shall still provide one thousand eighty (1,080) school hours in a single
school year and shall still provide any instructional hours minimum in a single school year.

Provided, however, that the flexibility granted herein also applies to a daily instructional hours
minimum otherwise required by the Rhode Island Board of Education or by the department of
elementary and secondary education. Nothing herein shall be deemed to limit a school district from
exceeding the minimum amounts of days and hours set forth herein. Provided further, that the
academic school year for all public schools, including traditional public schools, district charter
schools, independent charter schools, and mayoral academies, shall start on the same date of each
calendar year, which date shall be determined by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
(2) School districts intending to make use of the flexibility provided herein shall submit a
detailed school day plan and a proposed school calendar to the commissioner of elementary and
secondary education for approval. The commissioner shall review the submitted school day plan
and the submitted calendar to determine whether the plan and calendar are academically sound and
fiscally efficient. The commissioner shall not unreasonably deny the plan and/or the calendar.
(3) Professional development, including common planning time, is critically important to
provide the best instruction for students, meet legislative requirements, and maintain best practices.
For this reason, districts are allowed the flexible use early release days; provided that districts meet
the yearly requirement of one thousand eighty (1,080) school hours.
(b) School facilities shall include a sufficient number of kindergartens.
(c) On or before December 1, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary education
shall establish a policy that allows a school district to submit a detailed plan, at any time, to the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education that would allow the schools to conduct
instruction through virtual education when the schools have been closed due to inclement weather
or other emergency. The plan for virtual education would be subject to, and require approval by,
the council on elementary and secondary education in order to count as a school day.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002381
========
LC002381 - Page 2 of 3